California statutes. Vehicle Code
-------------------------------------------

4303.

If in the course of interstate operation of a vehicle registered in another state it is desirable to retain registration in such state, the applicant need not surrender the evidence of foreign registration, but shall deliver it to the department for purposes of inspection, and the department upon a proper showing shall register the vehicle in this State, but shall not issue a certificate of ownership for the vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

Upon application for registration of a vehicle previously registered outside this State, the department shall grant full faith and credit to the currently valid certificate of title describing the vehicle, the ownership thereof, and any liens thereon, issued by the state in which the vehicle was last registered, except that the laws of the state shall provide for the notation upon the certificate of title of any and all liens and encumbrances other than those dependent upon possession.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.

In the absence of knowledge by the department that any certificate of title issued by another state is forged, fraudulent, or void, the acceptance thereof by the department shall be a sufficient determination of the genuineness and regularity of the certificate and of the truth of the recitals therein, and no liability shall be incurred by any officer or employee of the department by reason of so accepting a certificate of title.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4306.

In the event a certificate of title issued by another state shows any lien or encumbrance upon the vehicle therein described, then the department upon registering the vehicle in this State and upon issuing a certificate of ownership shall include therein the name of the lienholder as legal owner unless documents submitted with the foreign certificate of title establish that the lien or encumbrance has been fully satisfied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4307.

In the event application is made in this state for registration of a vehicle and the department is not satisfied as to the ownership of the vehicle or the existence of foreign liens thereon, then the department may register the vehicle and issue a distinctive registration card and appropriate license plates but shall withhold issuance of a California certificate of ownership unless the applicant shall present documents sufficient to reasonably satisfy the department of the applicant’s ownership of the vehicle and sufficient to identify any liens thereon or the applicant shall post a bond pursuant to Section 4157.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 636, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4308.

In the event the department refuses to grant an application for registration in this State of a vehicle previously registered in another state, the department shall immediately return to the applicant all documents submitted by the applicant with the application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4309.

The department shall forthwith mail a notice of the filing of any application for registration of a vehicle previously registered outside this state upon written request of the governmental officer, agency, or authority which made the last registration of the vehicle outside this state. The notice shall contain like data as required on the application filed with the department. This section shall not apply to applications to register commercial vehicles operating in interstate transportation nor to vehicles last registered in a foreign province or country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1141.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Evidences of Registration [4450. - 4467.]

4450.

(a) The department upon registering a vehicle shall issue a certificate of ownership to the legal owner and a registration card to the owner, or both to the owner if there is no legal owner of the vehicle.

(b) The department may adopt regulations for the issuance and acceptance of a “certificate of title” or “certificate of ownership” in an electronic form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 15.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4450.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2012, the director shall develop an Electronic Lien and Title (ELT) Program, in consultation with lienholders, licensed dealers, and other stakeholders, to require that all lienholders’ title information be held in an electronic format, if the department determines that the program is cost effective compared to the current paper title and registration system.

(b) The director may establish an auto loan business volume threshold below which a lienholder is not required to participate in the program developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 540, Sec. 1.   (AB 1515)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4451.

The certificate of ownership shall contain all of the following:

(a) Not less than the information required upon the face of the registration card.

(b) Provision for notice to the department of a transfer of the title or interest of the owner or legal owner.

(c) Provision for application for transfer of registration by the transferee.

(d) Provision for an odometer disclosure statement pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 32705 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1035, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4452.

The department may issue a certificate of ownership to the legal owner of a vehicle without requiring registration, and may issue a facsimile copy of the certificate to the owner if there is no legal owner, the application is submitted in proper form, and one of the following conditions exist:

(a) The vehicle is registered pursuant to Section 5014.1.

(b) A certification has been filed with the department, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4604, that the vehicle has not been driven, moved, or left standing upon any highway so as to require payment of fees and that the owner will not thereafter permit that operation or movement of the vehicle or leave the vehicle standing on any highway without surrendering, or arranging to surrender, the certificate of ownership to the department and without first making an application for the regular registration of the vehicle and full payment of all fees required to be paid under this code and Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.

(a) The registration card shall contain upon its face, the date issued, the name and residence or business address or mailing address of the owner and of the legal owner, if any, the registration number assigned to the vehicle, and a description of the vehicle as complete as that required in the application for registration of the vehicle.

(b) The following motor vehicles shall be identified as such on the face of the registration card whenever the department is able to ascertain that fact at the time application is made for initial registration or transfer of ownership of the vehicle:

(1) A motor vehicle rebuilt and restored to operation that was previously declared to be a total loss salvage vehicle because the cost of repairs exceeds the retail value of the vehicle.

(2) A motor vehicle rebuilt and restored to operation that was previously reported to be dismantled pursuant to Section 11520.

(3) A motor vehicle previously registered to a law enforcement agency and operated in law enforcement work.

(4) A motor vehicle formerly operated as a taxicab.

(5) A motor vehicle manufactured outside of the United States and not intended by the manufacturer for sale in the United States.

(6) A park trailer, as described in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code, that when moved upon the highway is required to be moved under a permit pursuant to Section 35780.

(7) A motor vehicle that has been reacquired under circumstances described in subdivision (c) of Section 1793.23 of the Civil Code, a vehicle with out-of-state titling documents reflecting a warranty return, or a vehicle that has been identified by an agency of another state as requiring a warranty return title notation, pursuant to the laws of that state. The notation made on the face of the registration and pursuant to this subdivision shall state “Lemon Law Buyback.”

(c) The director may modify the form, arrangement, and information appearing on the face of the registration card and may provide for standardization and abbreviation of fictitious or firm names on the registration card whenever the director finds that the efficiency of the department will be promoted by so doing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 451, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.2.

In addition to the information required under Section 4453, the registration card of every farm labor vehicle shall contain the words, “Farm Labor Vehicle,” in conjunction with the vehicle identification information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.5.

(a) In the case of leased vehicles, the lessor and the lessee shall be shown on the registration card as the owner and the lessee of a vehicle, and the department shall designate their relationships upon the card and the ownership certificate by the words “lessor” and “lessee” and, at the election of the lessor, the department may designate thereon either the address of the lessor or the lessee.

(b) Transfers of ownership involving vehicles registered as provided in subdivision (a) shall only be effected upon the signature release of the lessor.

(c) The lessor shall provide the address, or the name and address, of the lessee on a form prescribed by the department in all cases where the information is not on the registration card and ownership certificate. Information received under this subdivision shall be used only for law enforcement and shall be available only to law enforcement officials at their request.

(d) A lessor, upon written request of the lessee or, if designated in writing, the lessee’s designee, shall disclose any pertinent information regarding the amount of payment and the documents necessary to exercise any option held by the lessee to purchase the leased vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.6.

On request of any member of the California Highway Patrol, any regularly employed and salaried police officer or deputy sheriff, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code, or any employee or officer of the department specified in Section 1655, who is conducting an investigation of a public offense, the lessor of a vehicle shall furnish the name and address of the lessee of a vehicle if that information does not appear on the registration card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4454.

(a) Every owner, upon receipt of a registration card, shall maintain the same or a facsimile copy thereof with the vehicle for which issued.

(b) This section does not apply when a registration card is necessarily removed from the vehicle for the purpose of application for renewal or transfer of registration, or when the vehicle is left unattended.

(c) Any violation of this section shall be cited in accordance with the provisions of Section 40610.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4455.

Any permit issued under Section 4004 shall be carried in the vehicle for which issued at all times while it is being operated in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.

(a) When selling a vehicle, dealers and lessor-retailers shall report the sale using the reporting system described in Section 4456.2. After providing information to the reporting system, the dealer or lessor-retailer shall do all of the following:

(1) The dealer or lessor-retailer shall attach for display a copy of the report-of-sale form provided by the reporting system on the vehicle before the vehicle is delivered to the purchaser.

(2) The dealer or lessor-retailer shall submit to the department an application accompanied by all fees and penalties due for registration or transfer of registration of the vehicle within 30 days from the date of sale, as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 9553, if
 the vehicle is a used vehicle, and within 20 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle. Penalties due for noncompliance with this paragraph shall be paid by the dealer or lessor-retailer. The dealer or lessor-retailer shall not charge the purchaser for the penalties.

(3) (A) Pursuant to the regulations adopted by the department under subdivision (f) of Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for retail sales of vehicles occurring on and after January 1, 2021, the dealer shall also submit with the application payment of the applicable sales tax required by the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) and the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) and the applicable transactions and use taxes required by the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6
 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) to the department within 30 days from the date of sale.

(B) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subparagraph do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “dealer” shall not include a new motor vehicle dealer as defined by Section 426, a manufacturer or remanufacturer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5, an automobile dismantler holding a license and certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5, or a lessor-retailer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11600) of Division 5, and subject to the provisions of Section 11615.5.

(4) As part of an application to transfer registration of a used vehicle, the dealer or lessor-retailer shall include all of the following information on the certificate of title, application for a duplicate certificate of title, or form prescribed by the department:

(A) Date of sale and report-of-sale number.

(B) Purchaser’s name and address.

(C) Dealer’s name, address, number, and signature, or signature of authorized agent.

(D) Salesperson number.

(5) If the department returns an application and the application was first received by the department within 30 days of the date of sale of the vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and within 20 days if the vehicle is a new
 vehicle, the dealer or lessor-retailer shall submit a corrected application to the department within 50 days from the date of sale of the vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and within 40 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle, or within 30 days from the date that the application was first returned by the department if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and within 20 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle, whichever is later.

(6) If the department returns an application and the application was first received by the department more than 30 days from the date of sale of the vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and more than 20 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle, the dealer or lessor-retailer shall submit a corrected application to the department within 50 days from the date of sale of the vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and within 40 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle.

(7) An application first received by the department more than 50 days from the date of sale of the vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and more than 40 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle, is subject to the penalties specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4456.1.

(8) The dealer or lessor-retailer shall report the sale pursuant to Section 5901.

(9) If the vehicle does not display license plates previously issued by the department, the dealer or lessor-retailer shall attach the temporary license plates issued by the reporting system.

(b) (1) A transfer that takes place through a dealer conducting a wholesale vehicle auction shall be reported to the department electronically in a manner approved by the department. The report shall contain, at a minimum, all of the
 following information:

(A) The name and address of the seller.

(B) The seller’s dealer number, if applicable.

(C) The date of delivery to the dealer conducting the auction.

(D) The actual mileage of the vehicle as indicated by the vehicle’s odometer at the time of delivery to the dealer conducting the auction.

(E) The name, address, and occupational license number of the dealer conducting the auction.

(F) The name, address, and occupational license number of the buyer.

(G) The signature of the dealer conducting the auction.

(2) Submission of the electronic report specified in paragraph (1) to the department shall fully satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) and subdivision (a) of Section 5901 with respect to the dealer selling at auction and the dealer conducting the auction.

(3) The electronic report required by this subdivision does not relieve a dealer of any obligation or responsibility that is required by any other law.

(c) A vehicle displaying a report-of-sale form or temporary license plate issued pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) may be operated without license plates until either of the following, whichever occurs first:

(1) The license plates and registration card are received by the purchaser.

(2) A 90-day period, commencing with the date of sale of the vehicle, has expired.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a vehicle may continue to display a report-of-sale form or temporary license plates after 90 days if the owner provides proof that the owner has submitted an application to the department pursuant to Section 4457 and it has been no more than 14 days since the permanent license plates were issued to the owner. A violation of this paragraph is a correctable offense pursuant to Section 40303.5.

(e) This section shall become operative January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 26.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.1.

(a) A dealer or lessor-retailer who violates paragraph (1), (2), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 shall pay to the department an administrative service fee of five dollars ($5) for each violation.

(b) A dealer or lessor-retailer who violates paragraph (4), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 shall pay to the department an administrative service fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each violation.

(c) Subject to subdivision (d), each violation of Section 4456 is, in addition to the obligation to pay an administrative service fee, a separate cause for discipline pursuant to Section 11613 or 11705.

(d) A violation of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 because of a dealer or lessor-retailer’s failure to submit to the department an application for registration or transfer of registration is a cause for disciplinary action pursuant to Section 11613 or 11705 only if the initial application is submitted 50 days or more following the date of sale of the vehicle if the vehicle is a used vehicle, and 40 days if the vehicle is a new vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1155, Sec. 3.1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.2.

(a) The department shall develop a system for dealers and lessor-retailers to electronically report the sale of a vehicle before the vehicle is delivered to the purchaser. At minimum, the system shall conform to the following conditions:

(1) The system shall provide a licensed dealer with the forms for use as prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 4456.

(2) For a vehicle that does not already display license plates, the system shall also produce a temporary license plate to be used and displayed in lieu of license plates, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4456. The temporary license plate shall display
 the report-of-sale number, expiration date, and any other information
 deemed necessary by the department.

(3) The dealer reporting system shall assign each transaction a unique report-of-sale number that will be displayed on the report-of-sale forms and any temporary license plate.

(4) The system shall record the vehicle identification number, vehicle year, model and make, name of dealer or lessor-retailer, purchaser name and address, and any other information deemed necessary by the department.

(b) The department shall develop standards
 for temporary license plates produced pursuant to this section. The standards shall specify content, format, and physical attributes that are cost effective and reasonably necessary to create appropriately durable and legible temporary license plates, including the type and quality of paper, ink, and printer required to create the temporary license plates. 

(c) Access to the dealer reporting system shall be restricted to authorized users of the department’s vehicle registration and occupational licensing databases.

(d) The department shall make the dealer reporting system operational for use no later than January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 4.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.3.

(a) The department shall charge a dealer or lessor-retailer a fee, as established by the director pursuant to subdivision (b), for each vehicle sold by a dealer or lessor-retailer and reported on a report-of-sale form issued by the department to a dealer or lessor-retailer, or for every vehicle sold by a dealer or lessor-retailer if that licensee does not use a report-of-sale form issued by the department because the report of the sale is given electronically or otherwise. The department shall collect the fee and the fees shall be paid to the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation as described in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 5. The department shall not charge more than a total of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in fees under this section to a dealer licensee within a calendar year.

(b) The director shall establish the fee at one dollar ($1) and shall collect the fee. The director shall deposit the fees received in the Motor Vehicle Account. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the revenues from the fees deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account, less an amount that the director determines is equal to the department’s costs related to collecting and processing the fees, is hereby continuously appropriated to the department for quarterly payment to the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation until the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation notifies the department that the balance in the recovery fund maintained by the corporation has reached five million dollars ($5,000,000). Within 90 days after being notified by the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation, the director shall cease collecting the fee. Thereafter, if the amount in the recovery fund maintained by the corporation is less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation shall notify the department of the amount necessary to return the recovery fund balance to five million dollars ($5,000,000). Within 90 days of being notified, the director shall collect the fee and pay the fee revenue required by this subdivision until the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation notifies the director that the recovery fund has reached five million dollars ($5,000,000). Within 90 days of being notified, the director shall cease collecting the fee.

(c) (1) The Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation shall reimburse the department for all reasonable expenses incurred in implementing this section.

(2) The Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation shall reimburse the department for all reasonable startup expenses incurred by the department to comply with this section within 90 days after the department begins collecting the fees and transmitting them to the Corporation as provided in this section.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section operative July 1, 2008, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.4.

(a) A motor vehicle sold or leased by a new motor vehicle dealer shall be registered by the dealer using electronic programs provided by a qualified private industry partner pursuant to Section 1685 if the department permits the transaction to be processed electronically.

(b) This section does not apply to the sale or lease of a motorcycle or off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010 or a recreational vehicle as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 329, Sec. 9.   (AB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.5.

(a) A dealer may charge the purchaser or lessee of a vehicle the following charges:

(1) A document processing charge for the preparation and processing of documents, disclosures, and titling, registration, and information security obligations imposed by state and federal law. The dealer document processing charge shall not be represented as a governmental fee.

(A) If a dealer has a contractual agreement with the department to be a private industry partner pursuant to Section 1685, the document processing charge shall not exceed eighty-five dollars ($85).

(B) If a dealer does not have a contractual agreement with
 the department to be a private industry partner pursuant to Section 1685, the document processing charge shall not exceed seventy dollars ($70).

(2) An electronic filing charge, not to exceed the actual amount the dealer is charged by a first-line service provider for providing license plate processing, postage, and the fees and services authorized pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 1685, including services related to reporting vehicle sales and producing temporary license plates pursuant to Sections 4456 and 4456.2. The electronic filing charge shall not be used to pay for additional fees, goods, or services not directly related to the electronic registration of a motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, the receipt by the dealer of free or discounted goods, services, or financial incentives. The director may establish, through the adoption of regulations, the maximum amount that a first-line service provider may charge a
 dealer. The electronic filing charge shall not be represented as a governmental fee.

(b) As used in this section, the term “first-line service provider” shall have the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1685.

(c) This section does not prohibit a first-line service provider from entering into contracts with dealers for products and services unrelated to electronic vehicle registration services.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 6.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4457.

If any registration card or license plate is stolen, lost, mutilated, or illegible, the owner of the vehicle for which the same was issued, as shown by the records of the department, shall immediately make application for and may, upon the applicant furnishing information satisfactory to the department, obtain a duplicate or a substitute or a new registration under a new registration number, as determined to be most advisable by the department. An application for a duplicate registration card is not required in conjunction with any other application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4458.

If both license plates or a permanent trailer identification plate are lost or stolen, the registered owner shall immediately notify a law enforcement agency, and shall immediately apply to the department for new plates in lieu of the plates stolen or lost. The department shall in every proper case, except in the case of plates which are exempt from fees, cause to be issued applicable license plates of a different number and assign the registration number to the vehicle for which the plates are issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4459.

If any certificate of ownership is stolen, lost, mutilated or illegible, the legal owner or, if none, then the owner of the vehicle for which the same was issued as shown by the records of the department shall immediately make application for and may, upon the applicant furnishing information satisfactory to the department, obtain a duplicate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4460.

(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles, the Traffic Adjudication Board, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, any regularly employed and salaried police officer or deputy sheriff or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code may take possession of any certificate, card, placard, permit, license, or license plate issued under this code, upon expiration, revocation, cancellation, or suspension thereof or which is fictitious or which has been unlawfully or erroneously issued. Any license plate which is not attached to the vehicle for which issued, when and in the manner required under this code, may be seized, and attachment to the proper vehicle may be made or required.

(b) Any document, placard, or license plate seized shall be delivered to the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4461.

(a) A person shall not lend a certificate of ownership, registration card, license plate, special plate, validation tab, or permit issued to him or her if the person desiring to borrow it would not be entitled to its use, and a person shall not knowingly permit its use by one not entitled to it.

(b) A person to whom a disabled person placard has been issued shall not lend the placard to another person, and a disabled person shall not knowingly permit the use for parking purposes of the placard or identification license plate issued pursuant to Section 5007 by one not entitled to it. A person to whom a disabled person placard has been issued may permit another person to use the placard only while in the presence or reasonable
 proximity of the disabled person for the purpose of transporting the disabled person. A violation of this subdivision is subject to the issuance of a notice of parking violation imposing a civil penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), for which enforcement shall be governed by the procedures set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 or is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) Except for the purpose of transporting a disabled person as specified in subdivision (b), a person shall not display a disabled person placard that was not issued to him or her or that has been canceled or revoked pursuant to Section 22511.6. A violation of this subdivision is subject to the issuance of a notice of parking violation imposing a civil penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), for which enforcement shall be governed by the procedures set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 or is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine
 of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), a person using a vehicle displaying a special identification license plate issued to another pursuant to Section 5007 shall not park in those parking stalls or spaces designated for disabled persons pursuant to Section 22511.7 or 22511.8, unless transporting a disabled person. A violation of this subdivision is subject to the issuance of a notice of parking violation imposing a civil penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000),
 for which enforcement shall be governed by the procedures set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 or is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(e)For the purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c), “disabled person placard” means a placard issued pursuant to Section 22511.55 or 22511.59.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4461.3.

In addition to any fine imposed for conviction of a violation of Section 4461 or 22507.8, a city or county may adopt an ordinance or resolution to assess an additional penalty of one hundred dollars ($100). All revenue generated from imposition of the penalty shall be used specifically for the purpose of improving enforcement of the provisions of this code relating to disabled parking spaces and placards within the city or county. Revenue generated from imposition of the penalty may not be used to supplant funds used for other general parking enforcement purposes, but may be used to offset the cost of establishing a new disabled parking enforcement program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4461.5.

In addition to, or instead of, any fine imposed for conviction of a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 4461, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for each conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4462.

(a) The driver of a motor vehicle shall present the registration or identification card or other evidence of registration of any or all vehicles under his or her immediate control for examination upon demand of any peace officer.

(b) A person shall not display upon a vehicle, nor present to any peace officer, any registration card, identification card, temporary receipt, license plate, temporary license plate, device issued pursuant to Section 4853, or permit not issued for that vehicle or not otherwise lawfully used thereon under this code.

(c) This section shall become operative January 1,
 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 90, Sec. 8.   (AB 516)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4462.5.

Every person who commits a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 4462, with intent to avoid compliance with vehicle registration requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Chapter 1 or Article 1 (commencing with Section 5600) of Chapter 2, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 640, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4463.

(a) A person who, with intent to prejudice, damage, or defraud, commits any of the following acts is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years, or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year:

(1) Alters, forges, counterfeits, or falsifies a certificate of ownership, registration card, certificate, license, license plate, temporary license plate, device issued pursuant to Sections 4853 and 4854, special plate, or permit provided for by this code or a comparable certificate of ownership, registration card, certificate, license, license
 plate, temporary license plate, device comparable to that issued pursuant to Sections 4853 and 4854, special plate, or permit provided for by a foreign jurisdiction, or alters, forges, counterfeits, or falsifies the document, device, or plate with intent to represent it as issued by the department, or alters, forges, counterfeits, or falsifies with fraudulent intent an endorsement of transfer on a certificate of ownership or other document evidencing ownership, or with fraudulent intent displays or causes or permits to be displayed or have in their possession a blank, incomplete, canceled, suspended, revoked, altered, forged, counterfeit, or false certificate of ownership, registration card, certificate, license, license plate, temporary license plate, device issued pursuant to
 Sections 4853 and 4854, special plate, or permit.

(2) Utters, publishes, passes, or attempts to pass, as true and genuine, a false, altered, forged, or counterfeited matter listed in paragraph (1) knowing it to be false, altered, forged, or counterfeited.

(b) A person who, with intent to prejudice, damage, or defraud, commits any of the following acts is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for six months, a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both that fine and imprisonment, which penalty shall not be suspended:

(1) Forges, counterfeits, or falsifies a disabled person
 placard or a comparable placard relating to parking privileges for disabled
 persons provided for by a foreign jurisdiction, or forges, counterfeits, or falsifies a disabled person placard with intent to represent it as issued by the department.

(2) Passes, or attempts to pass, as true and genuine, a false, forged, or counterfeit disabled person placard knowing it to be false, forged, or counterfeited.

(3) Acquires, possesses, sells, or offers for sale a genuine or counterfeit disabled person placard.
